Hawaii statutes.
[§23-96] Review for 2023 and every fifth
year thereafter. (a) The credits under the income tax listed in
subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2023 and every fifth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor at least twenty
days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 235-15--Credit for purchase of child
passenger restraint system;

(2) Section 235-55.6--Credit for employment-related
expenses for household and dependent care services;

(3) Section 235-55.7--Credit for a low-income
household renter; and

(4) Section 235-55.85--Credit for food and excise
tax. [L 2016, c 245, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next